Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.045

Educational liaison—Identification.

(1) The department must identify an educational liaison for youth in grades six through twelve who are subject to a proceeding under this chapter and who meet one of the following requirements:

(a) All parental rights have been terminated;

(b) Parents are unavailable because of incarceration or other limitations;

(c) The court has restricted contact between the youth and parents; or

(d) The youth is placed in a behavioral rehabilitative setting and the court has limited the educational rights of parents.

(2) If a child is placed in the custody of the department at the shelter care hearing, the department shall recommend the identified educational liaison at the shelter care hearing and all subsequent review hearings for the given case. The purpose of identifying the educational liaison at each hearing during the dependency case is to determine if the identified educational liaison remains appropriate for the case as youth change placements.

(3) It is presumed that the educational liaison is the youth's parent. If a youth's parent is not able to serve as the educational liaison, the department must identify another person to act as the educational liaison. It is preferred that the educational liaison be known to the youth and be a relative, other suitable person as described in RCW 13.34.130(1)(b), or the youth's foster parent. Birth parents with a primary plan of family reunification may serve as the educational liaison. The identified educational liaison should be a person committed to providing enduring educational support to the youth. If the department is not able to identify an adult with an existing relationship to the youth who is able to serve as the educational liaison, the court may appoint another adult as the educational liaison, such as the court-appointed special advocate if applicable, but may not appoint the youth's caseworker. In the event that any party disagrees with the department's recommendation, the court shall determine who will serve as the educational liaison based on who is most appropriate and available to act in the youth's educational interest.

[ 2013 c 182 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2013 c 182: See note following RCW 13.34.030.